Idaho statutes. Title 36 FISH AND GAME
Chapter 1 FISH AND GAME COMMISSION
§ 36-108. Fish and game expendable trust account.

The director may receive on behalf of the department any money or real or personal property donated, bequeathed, devised, or conditionally granted to the department. Such moneys received directly or derived from the sale of such property shall be deposited in an account in the agency asset fund to be known as the fish and game expendable trust account, which is hereby established. Moneys in the account may be appropriated to carry out the terms or conditions of such donation, bequest, devise, or grant, or in the absence of such terms or conditions, may be appropriated to the commission to expend, use, and administer such funds as advisable in the public interest and in accordance with the policies set forth in the Idaho fish and game code, and shall be used for no other purpose.

Pending such expenditure or use, surplus moneys in the fish and game expendable trust account shall be invested by the state treasurer in the manner provided for investment of idle state moneys in the state treasury by section 67-1210, Idaho Code. Interest received on all such investments shall be paid into the fish and game expendable trust account.

§ 36-109. Fish and game nonexpendable trust account.

The director may receive on behalf of the department any money or real or personal property donated, bequeathed, devised, or conditionally granted to the department. Such moneys received directly or derived from the sale of such property shall be deposited in an account in the agency asset fund to be known as the fish and game nonexpendable trust account, which is hereby established. The principal amount of moneys in the account are not subject to appropriation. Interest earned on investment of moneys in the account are subject to appropriation to carry out the terms or conditions of such donation, bequest, devise, or grant, and shall be used for no other purpose.

Moneys in the account shall be invested by the state treasurer in the manner provided for investment of idle state moneys in the state treasury by section 67-1210, Idaho Code. Interest received on all such investments shall be paid into the fish and game nonexpendable trust account.

§ 36-110. Fish and game federal account.

All moneys received from the federal government for the administration of any aspect of the fish and game laws of this state shall be deposited in the fish and game federal account, which is hereby established in such fund as the state controller directs.

Moneys in the fish and game federal account are subject to appropriation, and the provisions of section 67-3516, Idaho Code. Moneys in the account shall be invested by the state treasurer in the manner provided for investment of idle state moneys in the state treasury by section 67-1210, Idaho Code, if not prohibited or limited by the terms of applicable federal law or rule. Interest earned on all such investments shall be paid into the fish and game federal account.

§ 36-111. Fish and game set-aside account.

There is hereby established the fish and game set-aside account in the dedicated fund. The account shall have paid into it moneys as follows:

Fifty percent (50%) of each steelhead trout or anadromous salmon permit sold, except that class 7 permits shall be exempt from this provision. Moneys from this source shall be used for the acquisition, development and maintenance of parking areas, access sites, boat ramps and sanitation facilities in salmon and steelhead fishing areas, for management of and research on steelhead trout and anadromous salmon problems, and for technical assistance with litigation concerning steelhead and anadromous salmon originating in Idaho.

Two dollars ($2.00) from each combination hunting and fishing license, or each hunting license sold, as provided in sections 36-406 and 36-407, Idaho Code, except that class 4 and class 7 licenses shall be exempt from this provision. Moneys from this source shall be used for the purposes of acquiring access to and acquiring and rehabilitating big game ranges and upland bird and waterfowl habitats. Unless it is inconsistent with the goals of the commission, it is the intent of the legislature that the commission negotiate lease arrangements as compared with outright purchase of private property.

Three dollars and fifty cents ($3.50) from each pronghorn antelope, elk and deer tag sold as provided in section 36-409, Idaho Code, except that class 7 tags shall be exempt from this provision. Not less than one dollar and seventy-five cents ($1.75) of each three dollars and fifty cents ($3.50) collected shall be placed in a separate account to be designated as a feeding account. Moneys in this account shall be used exclusively for the purposes of actual supplemental winter feeding of pronghorn antelope, elk and deer. Moneys shall be used solely for the purchase of blocks, pellets and hay for such winter feeding purposes and/or for the purchase of seed or other material, labor or mileage that can be shown to directly provide feed or forage for the winter feeding of pronghorn antelope, elk and deer. The balance of moneys realized from this source may be used for the control of depredation of private property by pronghorn antelope, elk and deer and control of predators affecting pronghorn antelope, elk and deer. Moneys in the feeding account shall not be used for any purpose other than winter feeding as herein specified. Moneys in the feeding account may not be expended except upon the declaration of a feeding emergency by the director of the department of fish and game. Such emergency need not exist on a statewide basis but can be declared with respect to one (1) or more regions of the state. The department shall by rule establish the criteria for a feeding emergency. The department shall submit a yearly report to the senate resources and environment committee and the house resources and conservation committee of the legislature on or before July 31, detailing how funds in the feeding account have been expended during the preceding fiscal year.

Those amounts designated by individuals in accordance with section 63-3067A(3)(a), Idaho Code, and from fees paid under the provisions of section 49-417, Idaho Code. Moneys from these sources shall be used for a nongame management and protection program under the direction of the fish and game commission.

Money derived from the assessment of processing fees. Moneys derived from this source shall be used as provided in section 36-1407, Idaho Code.

Money derived from each license endorsement pursuant to the provisions of section 36-414, Idaho Code. Moneys derived from this source shall be spent as follows:
(i) The state controller shall annually, as soon after July 1 of each year as practical, transfer five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to the expendable big game depredation fund established in section 36-115(b), Idaho Code.

Moneys in the fish and game set-aside account and the feeding account established in subsection (1)(c) of this section are subject to appropriation and the provisions of section 67-3516, Idaho Code. Moneys in the fish and game set-aside account and the feeding account shall be invested by the state treasurer in the manner provided for investment of idle state moneys in the state treasury by section 67-1210, Idaho Code, with interest earned on investments from each account to be paid into that account.

§ 36-112. Animal damage control fund.

The animal damage control fund is hereby established in the state treasury. Moneys in the fund are subject to appropriation to the state animal damage control board established by section 25-2612A, Idaho Code, for the control of predatory animals and birds. In addition to moneys transferred into the fund pursuant to section 36-115(c), Idaho Code, the state controller shall annually, by August 1 of each year, transfer the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) from the fish and game fund [account] to the animal damage control fund. The state animal damage control board in using these moneys shall follow fish and game commission direction on actions regarding predatory animals or birds forwarded by the department by the same date.

§ 36-113. Electrofishing permits — Water quality data.

The department of fish and game shall enter into an agreement with the director to grant necessary permits and licenses for electrofishing needed to accomplish water quality monitoring pursuant to chapter 36, title 39, Idaho Code. Additionally, the department of fish and game shall provide as requested by basin advisory groups created pursuant to chapter 36, title 39, Idaho Code, any information regarding the presence or absence of aquatic species listed as “threatened,” “endangered” or “candidate” pursuant to the federal endangered species act, together with any special water quality requirements necessary to the recovery or maintenance of those individual species.

§ 36-114. Big game primary depredation account. [Repealed.]

§ 36-115. Nonexpendable big game depredation fund — Expendable big game depredation fund.

The nonexpendable big game depredation fund is hereby established in the state treasury. On July 1, 2005, the state controller shall transfer two million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($2,250,000) from the big game secondary depredation account, created pursuant to section 3, chapter 370, laws of 1990, to the nonexpendable big game depredation fund. Moneys in the fund shall be invested as provided in section 67-1210, Idaho Code, and interest earned on investment of idle moneys in the fund shall be paid to the expendable big game depredation fund. The principal amount in the fund shall not be appropriated, but only the interest earned on investment of the moneys in the fund shall be available for appropriation to the expendable big game depredation fund.

The big game secondary depredation account was created in the state treasury pursuant to section 3, chapter 370, laws of 1990, and shall, from the date of enactment of this act, be known and referred to as the expendable big game depredation fund. In addition to payments to the fund from the nonexpendable big game depredation fund as provided for in subsection (a) of this section and from the set-aside account as provided for in section 36-111(f), Idaho Code, the state controller shall annually, as soon after July 1 of each year as practical, transfer into the fund two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) from the fish and game account. Moneys in the fund are subject to appropriation for the purposes recited in section 36-122, Idaho Code, section 36-1108(a)3., Idaho Code, section 36-1108(b), Idaho Code, section 36-1109 and section 36-1110, Idaho Code. Moneys in the fund shall be invested as provided in section 67-1210, Idaho Code, and interest earned on investment of idle moneys in the fund shall be paid to the fund. The expendable big game depredation fund shall be under the administrative direction of the state controller.

The state controller shall annually report to the legislature, the division of financial management, the director of the department of agriculture and the director of the department of fish and game the amount of interest earnings and the availability of moneys in the expendable big game depredation fund for appropriation. At the close of each fiscal year, any unexpended and unencumbered balance that exceeds two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000), shall be transferred to the fish and game set-aside account to be earmarked for control of depredation of private property by pronghorn antelope, elk and deer and control of predators affecting pronghorn antelope, elk and deer established pursuant to section 36-111, Idaho Code. Transferred funds to the set-aside account shall be spent pursuant to the respective appropriation for the set-aside account.

Any payment for damages pursuant to section 36-1108(b), Idaho Code, is limited by the following conditions and requirements:

The full amount of any approved claim will not be paid at the time of approval, but shall be subject to the following conditions and requirements:

The director of the department of fish and game may order not more than one-half (½) of the amount of the approved claim that is to be paid from the expendable big game depredation fund to be paid immediately, if, in the judgment of the director, such payment is within the estimated total claims liability for that fiscal year from the expendable big game depredation fund.
(B) The total payment amount to any person for approved claims in the aggregate in a fiscal year, including any payment to any pass-through entity as defined in chapter 30, title 63, Idaho Code, from which the person receives income, and to any household member, shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the original expendable big game depredation fund appropriation for the fiscal year.

Each claimant must submit a statement of total damages sustained per occurrence. For each such statement, the following conditions and requirements apply:

The amount of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) must be deducted from each such statement. This deductible is a net loss to the owner or lessee, and will not be compensated for from the expendable big game depredation fund, but the owner or lessee is required to absorb only a single seven hundred fifty dollar ($750) deductible per claim.

Provided however, that for claims in subsequent years for damage to standing or stored crops in the same location as the first occurrence, the seven hundred fifty dollar ($750) deductible will be waived if the department failed to prevent property loss following the first occurrence.

Each approved claim must contain a certification by the director of the department of fish and game, or his designee, that:

All statutory requirements leading up to approval for payment have been met.

The claimant has certified that he will accept the amount approved as payment in full for the claim submitted, subject to the conditions and requirements of this subsection.

Any claim for damages pursuant to section 36-1109, Idaho Code, is limited by the following conditions and requirements:

The full amount of any approved claim will not be paid at the time of approval, but shall be subject to the following conditions and requirements:

The director of the department of fish and game may order that not more than one-half (½) of the amount of the approved claim to be paid immediately, if, in the judgment of the director, such payment is within the estimated total claims liability for that fiscal year from the expendable big game depredation fund.

The total payment amount to any person for approved claims in the aggregate in a fiscal year, including any payment to any pass-through entity as defined in chapter 30, title 63, Idaho Code, from which the person receives income, and to any household member, shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the original expendable big game depredation fund appropriation for the fiscal year.

The balance of all unpaid approved claim amounts shall be accumulated to a total as of June 30. If the balance in the expendable big game depredation fund appropriation is sufficient to pay all approved claims, the director shall promptly pay them. If the balance is not sufficient to pay the balance of all approved claims, the director shall pay a proportionate share to each claimant.
(D) The director shall encumber the balance of the appropriation, or moneys sufficient to pay the approved claims, whichever is the lesser.

Each claimant must submit a statement of total damages sustained per occurrence. For each such statement, the following condition applies: the amount of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) must be deducted from each such statement. Provided however, if an owner or caretaker suffers damage to or destruction of livestock in more than one (1) occurrence during the fiscal year, then only one (1) deductible must be subtracted from the claims and the deductible on subsequent claims will be waived. This deductible is a net loss to the owner or caretaker, and will not be compensated for from the expendable big game depredation fund.

Each approved claim must contain a certification by the director of the department of fish and game, or his designee, that:

All statutory requirements leading up to approval for payment have been met.

The claimant has certified that he will accept the amount approved as payment in full for the claim submitted, subject to the conditions and requirements of this subsection.

Any claim for damages to forage pursuant to section 36-1110, Idaho Code, is limited by the following conditions and requirements:

The full amount of any approved claim will not be paid at the time of approval, but shall be subject to the following conditions and requirements:

The director of the department of fish and game may order not more than one-half (½) of the amount of the approved claim to be paid immediately, if, in the judgment of the director, such payment is within the estimated total claims liability for that fiscal year from the expendable big game depredation fund.

The balance of all unpaid approved claim amounts shall be accumulated to a total as of June 30. If the balance in the expendable big game depredation fund appropriation is sufficient to pay all approved claims, the director shall pay them. If the balance is not sufficient to pay all approved claims, the director shall authorize a proportionate amount to be paid to each claimant.

The director shall encumber the balance of the appropriation, or moneys sufficient to pay the approved claims, whichever is the lesser.

Each claimant must submit a statement of total damages sustained per occurrence. For each such statement, the following conditions and requirements apply:

The amount of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) must be deducted from each such statement. This deductible is a net loss to the owner or lessee, and will not be compensated for from the expendable big game depredation fund.

The total amount of all claims for damages to forage that may be paid from the expendable big game depredation fund shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the amount of interest earned from investments of moneys in that fund in any one (1) fiscal year.

Each approved claim must contain a certification by the director of the department of fish and game, or his designee, that:

All statutory requirements leading up to approval for payment have been met.

The claimant has certified that he will accept the amount approved as payment in full for the claim submitted, subject to the conditions and requirements of this subsection.

(C) The balance of all unpaid approved claim amounts, including claims submitted under the provisions of sections 36-1109 and 36-1110, Idaho Code, shall be accumulated to a total as of June 30. If the balance in the expendable big game depredation fund appropriation is sufficient to pay the balance of all approved claims, the director shall pay them. If the balance is not sufficient to pay all approved claims, the director shall authorize a proportionate amount to be paid to each claimant.

(D) The director shall encumber the balance of moneys appropriated from the expendable big game depredation fund, or moneys sufficient to pay the approved claims, whichever is the lesser.

§ 36-116. Wolves — Solicitation for transfer.

Within thirty (30) days from the effective date of this act, the Idaho department of fish and game shall contact, in writing, all state agencies within the United States with comparable powers and duties as those vested in the department, soliciting interest in the transfer of wolves from Idaho to such agency. In the event an agency of another state requests such transfer, it shall pay to the state of Idaho an amount as determined by the department to cover costs associated with capture, transportation and any other associated administrative expenses.

§ 36-117 — 36-119. [Reserved.]

All classified personnel employed at state game farms and state fish hatcheries shall devote their entire time to the duties of their office, and shall not engage in any manner whatever in the operation of any fish hatchery or game farm, public or private, unless so ordered by the director and they shall not be entitled to have any holding in or own any private fish ponds, lakes or streams of this state, nor shall they engage in the selling or disposal of any wildlife whatever, except in the duties of their office and as directed by said director.

§ 36-121. Special counsel for department.

The director, with the approval of the governor, is hereby authorized to employ special counsel for the department of fish and game, and to pay reasonable attorneys’ fees and expenses of such counsel incurred in the conduct of business of the department of fish and game, or prosecution of violations thereof civilly or criminally, and such fees and expenses shall be a proper charge against the fish and game fund [account].

§ 36-122. Advisory committee.

There is hereby created the fish and game advisory committee. The committee shall consist of twelve (12) members. Six (6) members of the committee shall be appointed by the director of the department of fish and game to generally represent wildlife interests. Six (6) members of the committee shall be appointed by the director of the department of agriculture to generally represent agricultural interests. At the beginning of each odd-numbered year, the director of the department of agriculture shall appoint a chairman from among his appointees, and the director of the department of fish and game shall appoint a vice-chairman from among his appointees. At the beginning of each even-numbered year, the director of the department of fish and game shall appoint a chairman from among his appointees, and the director of the department of agriculture shall appoint a vice-chairman from among his appointees. The committee shall meet at such times as appropriate, but not less frequently than annually.

All members shall be appointed to serve three (3) year terms. Appointments to fill vacancies shall be for the balance of the unexpired term. All members shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the respective directors of the department of agriculture or the department of fish and game. Members shall be compensated as provided in section 59-509(b), Idaho Code, and such expenses shall be paid from the expendable big game depredation fund.

The department of fish and game shall provide staff assistance and support for the committee.

The committee shall have the authority to:

Act as a liaison between the commission, landowners, the department of agriculture, the department of fish and game, and wildlife, outdoor recreation and sportsmen’s organizations;

Act as an independent resource to give advice and recommendations on administration of the programs authorized in sections 36-1108 and 36-1109, Idaho Code.

§ 36-123. Winter feeding advisory committees.

A winter feeding advisory committee shall be established for each district where winter feeding of antelope, elk, and deer normally occurs. Each committee shall consist of five (5) members. The members shall be appointed and removed for cause by unanimous vote of the Idaho fish and game commission. It is intended that the committees reflect the cross section of the major interest groups associated with each district. Each committee shall meet at such times as appropriate, but not less frequently than annually, on or before December 1, before the winter feeding season arrives, whichever is earlier.

The term of office of a member shall be two (2) years, except a portion of the initial appointments may be for a term of one (1) year to provide staggered terms. Appointments to fill vacancies shall be for the balance of the unexpired term. The committees shall serve without compensation.

Each winter feeding advisory committee established pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall appoint a chairman. The chairmen of the committees shall meet at least annually to coordinate activities and promote consensus on issues of common interest among the winter feeding advisory committees. The chairmen may elect a leader from among the chairmen to call meetings and conduct and coordinate activities of the group.

The department of fish and game shall provide staff assistance and support for the committees.

The committees shall have the authority to:

Act as an independent resource in each district to give advice and recommendations on the administration of winter feeding programs;

Act as a liaison between the commission, the department, interest groups, and the public on winter feeding issues.

§ 36-124. Reciprocal licensure agreements with Indian tribes.

The commission is authorized to enter into a reciprocal licensure agreement with any federally recognized Indian tribe that possesses a reservation within this state. Pursuant to such a reciprocal licensure agreement, the commission may recognize licenses or permits issued by the tribe for the hunting, angling or trapping of wildlife as satisfying license or permit requirements imposed by the commission on such activities and the tribe may recognize licenses or permits issued by the commission for the hunting, angling or trapping of wildlife as satisfying license or permit requirements imposed by the tribe on such activities.

§ 36-125. Fixing assessment and fees for wildlife — Wolf control fund.

The fish and game commission shall comply with the provisions of section 22-5306, Idaho Code, in providing the wolf depredation control board with direction for use of fish and game funds transferred to the fish and game fund transfer subaccount of the wolf control fund made pursuant to the provisions of section 22-5306, Idaho Code.

§ 36-120. State game farms and fish hatcheries — Restrictions on employees.